Utah statutes.
54-1-2.5.   Procedures -- Adjudicative proceedings.

Except as specifically provided to the contrary in Chapter 7, the commission shall comply with the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, in its adjudicative proceedings.

